Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2 CONTROL OF WATER POLLUTION AND SURFACE-WATER USE
12-5-31.1. Applications, permits, and variances for public water supply reservoirs.

Upon request of any local government entity that desires to construct a new public water supply reservoir for which permits and certifications under Code Section 12-5-31 and Sections 401 and 404 of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. Sections 1341 and 1344, are required, the division shall make available in a single collection copies of all forms necessary for the purposes of making applications for such permits.

The period for granting or denying a permit application provided by subparagraph (c)(1)(A) of Code Section 12-2-2 shall likewise apply to decisions to issue certifications for purposes of Section 401 of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. Section 1341, justifications of need, and minimum instream flow certifications for construction of a new public water supply reservoir by a local government entity; and such shall be issued simultaneously to a local government entity that is a qualified applicant.

The division shall issue an affirmative variance from the requirements of Chapter 7 of this title, consistent with the exemption granted by paragraph (11) of Code Section

12-7-17

, to a permittee within seven days after granting the permit and issuing the certifications and documents specified under subsection (b) of this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-31.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 1-4/SB 342.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 12-5-483, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

1-4/SB 342, was redesignated as Code Section 12-5-31.1.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

1-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Water Conservation and Drought Relief Act.'"

Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

5-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in part that this Code section shall apply to all applications pending on or after July 1, 2008.

12-5-32. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Powers of division with respect to federal acts; receipt and expenditure of federal and state appropriations.

The division shall be the water pollution control and surface-water resource management agency of the state for all purposes of any federal water pollution control act or any other federal act within the purview of this article and may:

Take all necessary or appropriate action to obtain for the state the benefits of any federal act within the purview of this article;

Apply for, receive, and use federal funds made available under any federal act within the purview of this article;

Approve projects for which loans or grants under any federal act are made to any municipality, county, or agency of state government or to any private person or entity;

Participate through its authorized representatives in proceedings under any federal act within the purview of this article and recommend measures for the reduction of water pollution originating within the state or proper management of the state's surface-water resources; and

Receive and expend on behalf of the state all funds which are now or which may hereafter become available or allotted to the State of Georgia by virtue of any appropriation or act of Congress or regulation of the federal government, its agencies and instrumentalities, or by virtue of any appropriation by the General Assembly, for water quality control, management, and allocation of the state's surface-water resources within the purview of this article, or for any other purpose defined in this article to be administered by the division as provided in this article. The division is authorized to use so much of funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly for the purpose of matching federal grants as may be necessary to secure such grants and derive full advantage to the state of benefits contemplated under the terms of such grants, and to comply with the terms of such grants.

This Code section shall not prohibit the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission from exercising its powers under paragraph (9) of Code Section 2-6-27.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 23; Ga. L. 1977, p. 368, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 1-3/SB 342.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

1-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Water Conservation and Drought Relief Act.'"

Ga. L. 2008, p. 644,

§

5-1/SB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in part that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to all applications pending on or after July 1, 2008.

12-5-33. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Grants to counties, municipalities, or other public authority for water pollution control projects.

The division is authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to any county, municipality, or any combination thereof, or to any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, to assist them in the construction of those portions of water pollution control projects which qualify for federal aid and assistance under the provisions of Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P.L. 92-500), 33 U.S.C. Section 1281, et seq., as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217) or as may hereafter be amended.

The State of Georgia is further authorized to make grants as funds are available to any county, municipality, or any combination of the same, or to any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, by appropriate action of the General Assembly, with or without qualification for federal aid and assistance as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, where the need of such county, municipality, or combination thereof, or such public authority, agency, commission, or institution, is shown.

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 109, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 25; Ga. L. 1966, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 176, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 2.)

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-5-34. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Amount of state grant.

The state's contribution toward the construction of water pollution control projects shall not be limited by percentage contribution, and the State of Georgia may make grants to counties, municipalities, or combinations thereof in any amount up to the full cost of the construction of such projects where local need is shown and where such funds are available.

State funds may be provided for such projects or portions of projects wherever the need may exist in conjunction with or in addition to federal grants as might be received under Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P.L. 92-500), 33 U.S.C. Section 1281, et seq., as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217), or as such acts may hereafter be amended.

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 109, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 26; Ga. L. 1966, p. 328, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 3.)

12-5-35. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Administration of grants by division.

The division shall be the agency for the administration of the funds granted by the state. The administration of such granted funds shall be done in direct conjunction with the administration of federal funds granted for water pollution control projects.

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 109, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 27.)

Cross references.

- Administration of funds by director,

§

12-5-38.1

.

12-5-36. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Consistency with federal acts.

The determination of the relative need for, the priority of, and the standards of construction for federally assisted water pollution control projects shall be consistent with the provisions of Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P.L. 92-500), 33 U.S.C. Section 1281, et seq., as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217), or as may hereafter be amended.

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 109, § 4; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 28; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 4.)

12-5-37. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Intent of article with regard to state contributions.

It is the intent of this article that full advantage be taken of all funds available under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, but the State of Georgia shall not be limited in its contribution, and where no funds are available under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, the State of Georgia shall be authorized to appropriate funds for the alleviation of pollution problems and for the construction of water pollution control projects throughout the State of Georgia as the need may be shown by counties, municipalities, or combinations thereof, or any public authority, agency, commission, or institution. Such grants by the state may be made for specific communities or for water pollution control projects to be determined by the division and administered by it.

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 328, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 176, § 2.)

U.S. Code.

- The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1251 et seq.

12-5-38. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Management by division of federal construction grants program.

The division is authorized to manage the construction grants program as set forth in Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (P.L. 92-500), 33 U.S.C. Section 1281, et seq., as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217), or as may hereafter be amended, upon receiving delegation of such program from the administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency. The division shall manage such program in accordance with the requirements and conditions set forth in Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, as amended.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 5.)

12-5-38.1. Administration of funds; water pollution control and drinking water revolving funds.

The director is authorized to administer funds granted to the state by the administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Title VI of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as now or hereafter amended, for the purpose of providing assistance to municipalities or counties or any combination thereof or to any public authority, agency, commission, or institution for construction of treatment works as that term is defined in Section 212 of the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, which are publicly owned. The director is further authorized to administer funds granted to the state by the administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Title XIV of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as now or hereafter amended, for the purpose of providing assistance to municipalities or counties or any combination thereof or any public or, if authorized by law, any private authority, agency, commission, or institution for the construction of public drinking water works as such term is defined in Section 1401 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments of 1986, P.L. 99-339. The director shall administer all funds as provided in this Code section granted to the division prior to federal fiscal year 1994 until such grants are final and complete. All such grants made in or after federal fiscal year 1994 shall be administered by the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority. At the end of federal fiscal year 1994, the administration of the water pollution control revolving fund provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, and the fund balance, assets, liabilities, and retained earnings shall be transferred to the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority.

Any such funds received from the administrator of the federal Environmental Protection Agency shall be deposited in one or more water pollution control and drinking water revolving funds established by the director. In addition to such federal funds, other nonfederal funds may be deposited in such revolving funds as they become available to the authority. The forms of revolving fund assistance and the manner of administering such funds shall be determined in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources. Such funds shall be transferred to the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The director is authorized to contract with any other state agency, authority, board, or commission for the purpose of providing for the management, investment, and disbursement of all funds deposited in the water pollution control and drinking water revolving funds.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-38.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 350, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 555, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.)

Cross references.

- Administration of grants by state,

§

12-5-35

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, "federal" preceding "Water Pollution Control Act" was capitalized in subsection (a).

U.S. Code.

- The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, as amended, referred to in this Code section, are codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1251 et seq.

The Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

300f et seq.

12-5-39. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Area-wide waste treatment management.

The division is authorized to develop and operate a continuing area-wide waste treatment management planning process pursuant to its powers contained in this article for all portions of the state for which the state is required to act as the planning agency in accordance with Section 208 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1288, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217). With regard to any program submitted by the Governor pursuant to subsection 208(b)(4)(A) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1288, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217), the director is empowered with the authority to take such action to comply with the requirements of subsections 208(b)(4)(B)(i) through (v) of such act.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 6.)

U.S. Code.

- Section 208(b)(4)(A) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1288(b)(4)(A). Section 208(b)(4)(B)(i) through (v) of that same Act is codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1288(b)(4)(B)(i) through (v).

Law reviews.

-
For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).

12-5-40. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Adoption of rules and regulations regarding application for state grants.

The Board of Natural Resources is empowered to adopt such rules, regulations, and procedures to be followed in applying for state grants authorized in this article as shall be necessary for the effective administration thereof.

(Ga. L. 1961, p. 109, § 5; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 29.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Water quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-6.

12-5-41. Aid to pollution control and surface-water management - Water and sewage treatment facilities or systems for eligible planned communities.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-1/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 1215,

§

7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3,

§

12.

12-5-42. Cooperative efforts for abatement of pollution; order by director; request for hearing; allowance of reasonable time for abatement.

Whenever the division determines that any person is discharging sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes into any waters of the state in a degree which prevents the water from meeting the established standards of water purity, the division shall act to secure the person's cooperation in the reduction or elimination of the detrimental effects of the discharge.

The division shall supply to the person causing the pollution such technical and scientific information as may be helpful in reducing or eliminating the polluting effects of the discharge, but the responsibility for development and application of means of preventing pollution rests with the person causing the pollution.

Whenever any person refuses to cooperate with the efforts of the director to reduce pollution, the director may issue an order to bring about the reduction or elimination of the pollution. Any order issued by the director under this article shall become final unless the person aggrieved requests in writing a hearing before the director no later than 30 days after such order is served. However, before issuing or enforcing such an order, the director shall allow any person a reasonable time to make the necessary financial arrangements or make other necessary preparations for the elimination of the pollution.

Whenever the division determines that a violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this article relating to the withdrawal, diversion, or impoundment of surface water has occurred, the division shall by conference, conciliation, or persuasion attempt to convince the violator to cease such violation. If in the opinion of the director such efforts fail, the director may issue an order to bring about the cessation of such violation. Such order shall specify the alleged violation and shall prescribe a reasonable time for corrective action to be accomplished. Any order issued pursuant to this subsection shall become final unless the person aggrieved requests a hearing in writing before the director not later than 30 days after such order is served.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 11; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1000, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 995, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-5-43. Administrative hearings.

Whenever a person is aggrieved or adversely affected by any action or by any order or orders of the director, or by any action or by any order or orders pursuant to authority delegated by the director, such person may request and obtain a hearing by filing a petition with the director no later than 30 days after such order or notice of action is served upon such person. Code Section 50-13-13 shall apply insofar as it is applicable to the administrative procedure necessary under this article.

Code Sections 50-13-15 through 50-13-17 shall apply to all hearings held under this article.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 12; Ga. L. 1966, p. 316, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1000, § 2.)

12-5-44. Judicial review.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the department and who is aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case is entitled to judicial review under this article. A preliminary, procedural, or intermediate action or ruling is immediately reviewable if review of the final decision would not provide an adequate remedy. In this connection, all proceedings for judicial review shall be in accordance with Code Section 50-13-19.

The division or any other party to the proceeding may secure a review of the final judgment of the superior court to the appellate courts of this state.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 13; Ga. L. 1966, p. 316, § 4.)

12-5-45. Judgment in accordance with division's order.

The division may file in the superior court in the county in which the person under order resides, or in the county in which the violation occurred or, if the person is a corporation, in the county in which the corporation maintains its principal place of business, a certified copy of a final order of the director or the administrative law judge unappealed from or of a final order of the administrative law judge affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. The judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 191, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 3.)

12-5-46. Effect of article on rights of action.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to alter or abridge any right of action existing in law or equity, civil or criminal, nor shall any provision of this article be construed to prevent any person, as a riparian owner or otherwise, from exercising his rights to suppress nuisances or to abate any pollution.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 17.)

Cross references.

- Property rights in water generally, T. 44, C. 8.

Diversion, obstruction, or pollution of stream as constituting trespass,

§

51-9-7

.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Water Rights, Public Resources, and Private Commodities: Examining the Current and Future Law Governing the Allocation of Georgia Water," see 38 Ga. L. Rev. 1009 (2004). For article, "Sharing Water Through Interbasin Transfer and Basis of Origin Protection in Georgia: Issues for Evaluation in Comprehensive State Water Planning for Georgia's Surface Water Rivers and Groundwater Aquifers," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (2004).

12-5-47. Emergency orders; hearing.

Whenever the division finds that an emergency exists requiring that such action be taken as it deems necessary to meet the emergency, notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but, on application to the division, shall be afforded a hearing as soon as possible. On the basis of such hearing, the division shall continue such order in effect, revoke it, or modify it.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 20.)

12-5-48. Injunctive relief.

Whenever in the judgment of the division any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute any violation of this article, the division may make application to the superior court of the county where such person resides, or if nonresident of this state, then to the superior court of the county where such person is engaged in or is about to engage in such act or practice, for an order enjoining and restraining such act or practice. Upon a showing by the division that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing a lack of adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 21.)

12-5-49. Representation of division and its agents by Attorney General and his staff.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the division and its agents or designate some member of his staff to represent them in all actions in connection with this article.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 19.)

12-5-50. Intent of article as to conflicts with federal laws and as to eligibility of division or departments of state government for federal funds; remedial action.

Nothing in this article is intended to conflict with any provision of federal law or result in loss of eligibility for any federal funds on the part of the division or any department of state government. In case such a conflict or loss of federal funds should occur by virtue of enactment of any portion of this article, then the division is authorized and empowered to take such action as may be necessary and to effect such changes within the division as may be necessary to prevent loss of such funds to the division or any department of state government affected and to secure to the same the full benefit of the federal laws.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 31.)

12-5-51. Civil liability.

Any person who intentionally or negligently causes or permits any sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes, oil, scum, floating debris, or other substance or substances to be spilled, discharged, or deposited in the waters of the state, resulting in a condition of pollution as defined by this article, shall be liable in damages to the state and any political subdivision thereof for any and all costs, expenses, and injuries occasioned by such spills, discharges, or deposits. The amount of the damages assessed pursuant to this Code section shall include, but shall not be limited to, any costs and expenses reasonably incurred by the state or any political subdivision thereof, as the case may be, in cleaning up and abating such spills, discharges, or deposits, and any costs and expenses reasonably incurred in replacing aquatic life destroyed by such spills, discharges, or deposits. Damages to the state shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted in the name of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources and shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. Damages to a political subdivision shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by such subdivision.

Any person who intentionally, negligently, or accidentally causes or permits any toxic, corrosive, acidic, caustic, or bacterial substance or substances to be spilled, discharged, or deposited in the waters of the state, except by providential cause, in amounts, concentrations, or combinations which are harmful to the public health, safety, or welfare, or to animals, birds, or aquatic life, shall be strictly liable in damages to the state and any political subdivision thereof for any and all costs, expenses, and injuries occasioned by such spills, discharges, or deposits. Damages to the state shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted in the name of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources and shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. Damages to a political subdivision shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by such subdivision.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 190, § 1.)

12-5-52. Civil penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this article or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this article or, negligently or intentionally, failing or refusing to comply with any final or emergency order of the director issued as provided in this article, shall be liable to a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000.00 per day for each day during which such violation continues; provided, however, that a separate and later incident creating a violation within a 12 month period shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $100,000.00 per day for each day during which such violation continues.

The director, after a hearing, shall determine whether or not any person has violated any provision of this article or has, negligently or intentionally, failed or refused to comply with any final or emergency order of the director and may, upon a proper finding, issue his order imposing such civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Any person so penalized under this Code section is entitled to judicial review. In this connection, all hearings and proceedings for judicial review under this Code section shall be in accordance with Code Section 12-5-44. All penalties recovered by the director as provided by this article shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

(Ga. L. 1971, p. 87, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 999, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, § 13; Ga. L. 1986, p. 350, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1211, § 1.)

12-5-53. Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this article or who fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any final order of a court lawfully issued as provided in this article or who violates any requirement imposed in a pretreatment program approved by the director or who introduces into a sewer system or into a publicly owned treatment works any pollutant or hazardous substance which causes or may reasonably be anticipated to cause personal injury or property damage or which causes such treatment works to violate any effluent limitation or condition in any permit issued to the treatment works pursuant to this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $2,500.00 per day nor more than $25,000.00 per day of violation, or imprisoned no more than one year, or both. If the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of such person under this subsection, punishment shall be by a fine of not more than $50,000.00 per day of violation, by imprisonment for not more than two years, or both.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained by this article or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this article, or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained by this article or by any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued under this article, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $10,000.00, imprisoned not more than two years, or both. If the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of such person under this subsection, punishment shall be by a fine of not more than $20,000.00 per day of violation, or by imprisonment for not more than four years, or both.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this article or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this article or who knowingly fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any final order of a court lawfully issued as provided in this article or who knowingly violates any requirement imposed in a pretreatment program approved by the director or who knowingly introduces into a sewer system or into a publicly owned treatment works any pollutant or hazardous substance which causes or may reasonably be anticipated to cause personal injury or property damage or which causes such treatment works to violate any effluent limitation or condition in any permit issued to the treatment works pursuant to this article shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $5,000.00 per day nor more than $50,000.00 per day of violation or by imprisonment for not more than two years, or both. If the conviction is for a violation committed after the first conviction of such person under this subsection, punishment shall be by a fine of not more than $100,000.00 per day of violation or by imprisonment for not more than four years, or both.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this article or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this article or who knowingly fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any final order of a court lawfully issued as provided in this article and who knows at that time that he thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than $250,000.00 or imprisonment of not more than 15 years, or both. A defendant that is an organization shall, upon conviction of violating this subsection, be subject to a fine of not more than $1 million. The following provisions apply for the purpose of this subsection:

In determining whether a defendant who is an individual knew that his conduct placed another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, the person is responsible only for actual awareness or actual belief that he possessed, and knowledge possessed by a person other than the defendant but not by the defendant himself may not be attributed to the defendant; except that in proving the defendant's possession of actual knowledge, circumstantial evidence may be used, including evidence that the defendant took affirmative steps to shield himself from relevant information;

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution that the conduct charged was consented to by the person endangered and that the danger and conduct charged were reasonably foreseeable hazards of an occupation, a business, a profession, medical treatment, or medical or scientific experimentation conducted by professionally approved methods and that the person endangered had been made aware of the risks involved prior to giving consent. Such defense must be established by the preponderance of the evidence;

The term "organization" means a legal entity, other than a government, established or organized for any purpose, and such term includes a corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, joint stock company, foundation, institution, trust, society, union, or any other association of persons; and

The term "serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

It shall be an affirmative defense under subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section that the introduction of any pollutant or hazardous substance into a sewer system or a publicly owned treatment works was in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local requirements which govern the introduction of a pollutant or hazardous substance into a sewer or publicly owned treatment works.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 22; Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, § 14; Ga. L. 1986, p. 350, § 5.)